Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Joinder With Adjoining Supervisors District Which Has Certificate of Necessity and Convenience

§ 57-1-171.
Definitions for Sections 57-1-171 through 57-1-179.

The word “municipality” as used in Sections 57-1-171 through 57-1-179 shall mean “county, supervisors district, city, town or village.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8937; Laws, 1946, ch. 320, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 146.

§ 57-1-173.
Application for and issuance of certificate.

Whenever a supervisors district or a city, town or village in a supervisors district, or both, which adjoins a supervisors district in the same county, already having a certificate of convenience and necessity issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, and which has already voted to engage in an enterprise authorized under the provisions of said sections, desires to join in the enterprise, the adjoining supervisors district or city, town or village, or both, wishing to so join may make application to the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board for a certificate of convenience and necessity, the same as if such supervisors district or city, town or village, or both, had joined with the supervisors district already having a certificate of convenience and necessity in its original application. Such application shall show that the joining of the said supervisors district or city, town or village, or both, will benefit such municipality by the use of its natural resources or the employment of its labor, and that it has adequate property values and suitable financial conditions so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of all of the property in the municipality, and that the joining of such municipality in the operation of the enterprise by the supervisors district already holding a certificate of convenience and necessity shall result in the enlargement of the enterprise and that such enlargement of the enterprise shall benefit the petitioning municipality. The board may issue a certificate of convenience and necessity the same as if the petitioning municipality had joined in the original application. However, when bonds are issued jointly by a municipality and a county or a supervisors district of such county, then in such event, the limitation of twenty percent (20%) of the assessed valuation of such municipality or county or supervisors district shall apply to each such taxing district even though such assessments include identical property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8937; Laws, 1946, ch. 320, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 146.

§ 57-1-175.
Election; issuance of bonds.

When such certificate of convenience and necessity is issued authorizing the petitioning municipality to join in the operation of the enterprise, proceedings thereafter shall be held within such municipality as is provided in Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51 with reference to notice, voting and election, and such municipality may issue its bonds in such amount as may be authorized by the board for the enlargement and extension of the enterprise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8937; Laws, 1946, ch. 320, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 146.

§ 57-1-177.
Application of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51.

All provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, so far as the same are applicable, shall apply to all proceedings by the municipality desiring to join with another municipality which has already received a certificate of convenience and necessity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8937; Laws, 1946, ch. 320, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 146.

§ 57-1-179.
Interest of joining municipality in enterprise.

The municipality joining with another municipality which has already received a certificate of convenience and necessity shall have an undivided interest in the enterprise in the same proportion as the amount of bonds issued by such municipality bears to the total bonds issued by both municipalities in the establishment of such enterprise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8937; Laws, 1946, ch. 320, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1960, ch. 146.